Massachusetts, session 194th, H3955.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 46 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(m) Within 30 days of receiving a certified decree of change of name pursuant to the
second paragraph of section 12 of chapter 210, the city or town clerk shall correct, amend or
supplement the minor’s birth record in their office. The city or town clerk shall provide the
parents of the minor a free certified copy of the corrected, amended or supplemented birth
record.
SECTION 2. Section 12 of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Within 30 days of granting a petition for a change of name in the case of a minor, the
court shall send a certified decree of change of name to the city or town clerk where the minor’s
birth occurred.
of 1